Hawaii statutes.
§664-4 Copy sent to department. Each
commissioner of boundaries shall, within thirty days after issuing a
certificate of boundaries, deposit a certified copy thereof in the office of
the department of land and natural resources, and shall also deposit a
certified copy of the approved or adopted plan thereof with the department. [L
1894-5, c 14, §10; am L 1915, c 79, §1; RL 1925, §555; RL 1935, §3663; RL 1945,
§10204; RL 1955, §234-4; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS
§664-4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next